Massachusetts, session 194th, H4046.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There shall be established, pursuant to section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws, a
special commission to study alimony and recommend any improvements to the alimony system
in the commonwealth.
(b) The special commission shall be comprised of the following members: the chairs of
the joint committee on the judiciary, who shall serve as co-chairs; 1 member appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the house
of representatives; 1 member appointed by the president of the senate; 1 member appointed by
the minority leader of the senate; 1 member appointed by the chief justice of the probate and
family court; 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Bar Association, who shall have
of 2

expertise in family law and alimony; and 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Legal
Assistance Corporation, who shall have expertise in family law and alimony.
(c) The study shall include, but not be limited to: (i) statewide trends in alimony awards
over time, including determining what percentage of alimony awards constitutes each time of
alimony and how often courts grant requests for modifications of alimony; (ii) a review of the
formula used for determining alimony in the commonwealth, including a tax analysis of the
current formula; (iii) analysis on the economic implications of alimony on families in the
commonwealth; (iv) comparison of Massachusetts alimony laws with alimony laws in other
states, including trends pertaining to alimony; (v) analysis of the interplay between alimony and
child support; (vi) court enforcement of alimony, particularly with regard to whether and how
enforcement differs from enforcement of child support; (vii) the uniformity of the application of
alimony laws among counties in the commonwealth; and (viii) any recommendations on changes
to the alimony system in the commonwealth.
(d) The commission shall prepare a report detailing the results of the study, along with
any recommendations and any proposed standards and legislation necessary to carry out its
recommendations. The report shall be submitted to the: (i) joint committee on the judiciary; and
(ii) clerks of the house of representatives and senate not later than December 31, 2026.
of 2